Arkansas, session 2025, SB561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-14-1705(b), concerning the validity of a
temporary preprinted paper buyer's tag and sticker issued to the purchaser of
a motor vehicle, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
(3)(A) A person who has obtained a preprinted paper buyer's tag
and sticker under subsection (a) or subdivision (b)(2) of this section may
apply to the Office of Motor Vehicle for one (1) additional temporary
preprinted paper buyer's tag and sticker if the person:
(i) Pays the fee for a temporary preprinted paper
buyer's tag and sticker under subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this section;
*ZRC098*
04-03-2025 09:41:47 ZRC098

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB561
(ii) Provides proof to the Office of Motor Vehicle
that the person has:
(a) Assessed the motor vehicle for which the
temporary preprinted paper buyer's tag and sticker was issued; and
(b) Paid any personal property taxes due on
the motor vehicle for which the temporary preprinted paper buyer's tag and
sticker was issued;
(iii) Applies for the additional temporary
preprinted paper buyer's tag and sticker allowed under this subdivision
(b)(3)(A) before the expiration of the temporary preprinted paper buyer's tag
and sticker issued under subsection (a) or subdivision (b)(2) of this
section; and
(iv) Has not received a permanent license plate
issued for the motor vehicle at the time of application.
(B) An additional temporary preprinted paper buyer's tag
and sticker issued under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section shall expire
thirty (30) calendar days from the date that the additional temporary
preprinted paper buyer's tag and sticker was issued.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-14-1705(i), concerning penalties for the
misuse of a temporary preprinted paper buyer's tag and sticker issued to the
purchaser of a motor vehicle, is amended to add an additional subdivision to
read as follows:
(4) A buyer who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found
guilty of continuing to display a temporary preprinted buyer's tag and
sticker after the expiration date of the temporary preprinted buyer's tag and
sticker shall be fined:
(A) One hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense; and
(B) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the second and
subsequent offenses.

/s/M. Johnson




04-03-2025 09:41:47 ZRC098